Hawaii statutes.
§291C-27 Emergency vehicle
stopped for emergencies; duty of approaching vehicle. (a) A driver of a
vehicle that is approaching an emergency vehicle that is stopped for an
emergency, investigation of a possible traffic violation, rendering assistance
to a police officer, or other official duties, as indicated by the flashing
emergency lights of the stopped emergency vehicle, shall:

(1) Slow down to a reasonable and prudent speed that
is safe under the circumstances of an emergency road situation ahead. Reasonableness
and prudence shall take into account weather conditions, road conditions, and
vehicular and pedestrian traffic in the immediate area. If necessary, the
driver shall come to a complete stop before making a lane change under
paragraph (2); and

(2) Make a lane change into the adjacent lane if
necessary and if it is safe to do so, or if possible, to two lanes over which
leaves one lane between the driver and the emergency vehicle.

(b) As used in this section, "emergency
vehicle" means a police or fire department vehicle, ocean safety vehicle,
emergency medical services vehicle, freeway service patrol vehicle, sheriff
division vehicle, Hawaii emergency management agency vehicle, county emergency
management vehicle, civil defense vehicle, department of transportation harbors
division vehicle, department of land and natural resources division of
conservation and resources enforcement vehicle, or a tow truck.

(c) Violation of subsection (a) shall not be
subject to section 287-20, relating to furnishing proof of financial
responsibility.

A violation of subsection (a) shall constitute
a violation if no death or injury results from the violation.

If a death or injury occurs and is attributable
to the driver of the vehicle for a violation of subsection (a), then the driver
shall instead be charged under section 707-702.5 for negligent homicide in the
first degree; section 707-703 for negligent homicide in the second degree;
section 707-704 for negligent homicide in the third degree; section 707-705 for
negligent injury in the first degree; or section 707-706 for negligent injury
in the second degree, as applicable. [L 2012, c 318, §2; am L 2015, c 192, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next